Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB368.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 2 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Commonwealth of Kentucky shall be exempt from the advancement of time
provision known as daylight saving time as provided for in 15 U.S.C. sec. 260a.
(2) The Commonwealth of Kentucky and its political subdivisions shall at all times
observe the standard time of the United States as provided for in 15 U.S.C. secs.
261 to 263.
Section 2. This Act takes effect October 31, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/13/2026 2:08 PM Jacketed